New Jersey, session 222, A919.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As a condition of enrollment in NJ FamilyCare, a health care provider who practices under a State license with the authority to prescribe psychotropic drugs shall: (1)   provide the following to the parent or guardian of a child  for whom the provider is prescribing a psychotropic drug, prior to issuing the initial prescription and each time a prescription is  refilled for the child: (a)   the drugs Medication Guide, as defined and regulated under 21 C.F.R. 208 et seq., provided that such a Medication Guide is required by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the drug; (b)   information regarding any evidence-based alternatives to the use of the psychotropic drug to treat the childs diagnosis; and (c)   information on how to use and access the United States Food and Drug Administrations Adverse Event Reporting System Public Dashboard, MedWatch Online Voluntary Reporting Form, and any subsequent tools implemented by the United States Food and Drug Administration to replace or supplement these two tools; (2)   obtain a signed consent form from the parent or guardian of a child  for whom the provider is prescribing a psychotropic drug, immediately following the fulfillment of the provisions outlined in paragraph (1) of subsection a. of this section, stating that the parent or guardian: (a)   understands any potential risks or side effects of the drug, (b)   is aware of any evidenced-based alternatives to the use of the drug; and (c)   has been informed of the existing tools available from the United States Food and Drug Administration to report adverse effects of the drug on the child and to research reports of adverse effects of the drug on other patients; and (3)   retain the signed consent form, completed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section, in the childs patient file. b.    As used in this section: Child means an individual 18 years of age and younger who is enrolled in NJ FamilyCare. NJ FamilyCare means the program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.), which includes the Medicaid program and the Childrens Health Insurance Program. "Psychotropic drug" means a medication prescribed to a patient, such as a stimulant, anti-anxiety, anti-depressant, anti-psychotic, and mood stabilizer drug, to affect the central nervous system and to treat a behavioral health disorder or illness. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to secure federal financial participation for State expenditures under the federal Medicaid program and Childrens Health Insurance Program. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month following enactment, except that the Commissioner of Human Services may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.